Ohio, session 136, HB956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 5164.40 and 5164.41 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5164.40. No person shall act as a provider of medicaid transportation services unless the person provides to the department of medicaid, on an annual basis, proof of commercial automobile liability insurance in amounts sufficient to show proof of financial responsibility, as that term is defined in section 4509.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5164.41. (A) No person shall act as a provider of medicaid in-home care services prior to providing to the department of medicaid, on an annual basis, proof that the person's actions are covered under a policy of liability insurance providing coverage of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury or death of one person in each occurrence. (B) As used in this section, "in-home care services" include all of the following: (1) Personal care services; (2) Home health services covered by the medicaid program as part of the home health services benefit pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 440.70; (3) Services provided under a medicaid home and community-based services medicaid waiver component; (4) Any other medicaid services that are provided to a medicaid recipient in either a residential or community setting.